Mississippi, session 2026, HB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-25-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-25-3.  (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the school board of any school district maintaining a secondary school which includes any of the grades nine (9) through twelve (12) inclusive, shall establish and maintain driver education and training programs for pupils enrolled in the day secondary schools in that district. (2)  Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, every pupil enrolled in a day secondary school in a district described in subsection (1) of this section in any of the grades nine (9) through twelve (12) inclusive, shall be required to participate in a driver education and training program maintained by the school district.  Upon satisfactory completion of the driver education and training program, the school district shall issue a Certificate of Completion to the pupil and deliver a copy of the certificate to the State Department of Education. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.